Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.097

Supplying information on the eligibility of persons to possess firearms, purchase firearms, or be issued a concealed pistol license.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1163-S2.SL) ***

(1) The health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities shall, upon request of a court, law enforcement agency, or the state, supply such relevant information as is necessary to determine the eligibility of a person to possess a firearm, to be issued a concealed pistol license under RCW 9.41.070, or to purchase a firearm under RCW 9.41.090.

(2) Mental health information received by: (a) The department of licensing pursuant to RCW 9.41.047 or 9.41.173; (b) an issuing authority pursuant to RCW 9.41.047 or 9.41.070; (c) a chief of police or sheriff pursuant to RCW 9.41.090 or 9.41.173; (d) a court or law enforcement agency pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; or (e) the Washington state patrol firearms background check program pursuant to RCW 9.41.090, shall not be disclosed except as provided in RCW 42.56.240(4).

[ 2023 c 161 s 6; 2019 c 3 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 1639, approved November 6, 2018); 2018 c 201 s 6005; 2009 c 216 s 6; 2005 c 274 s 202; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 412; 1983 c 232 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 161: See note following RCW 9.41.090.

Finding—Short title—Effective dates—Implementation—2019 c 3 (Initiative Measure No. 1639): See notes following RCW 9.41.360.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 201: See notes following RCW 41.05.018.

Finding—Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Contingent expiration date—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.

Severability—1983 c 232: See note following RCW 9.41.010.